Washington statutes.
RCW 18.25.0196

Discrimination—Policy costs as additional compensation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the purpose of RCW 18.25.0192 through 18.25.0195 and 18.25.0197 it is immaterial whether the cost of any policy, plan, agreement, or contract be deemed additional compensation for services, or otherwise.

[ 2000 c 171 s 6; 1974 ex.s. c 97 s 5. Formerly RCW 18.25.160.]

NOTES:

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 97: See note following RCW 18.25.0192.